Illinois, session 104th, HB2861.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Business Corporation Act of 1983 is amended 5by changing Sections 15.35 as follows: 6    (805 ILCS 5/15.35)  (from Ch. 32, par. 15.35)7    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-16, 103-8, and 103-592)8    Sec. 15.35. Franchise taxes payable by domestic 9corporations. For the privilege of exercising its franchises 10in this State, each domestic corporation shall pay to the 11Secretary of State the following franchise taxes, computed on 12the basis, at the rates and for the periods prescribed in this 13Act:14        (a) An initial franchise tax at the time of filing its 15    first report of issuance of shares.16        (b) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing 17    (1) a report of the issuance of additional shares, or (2) a 18    report of an increase in paid-in capital without the 19    issuance of shares, or (3) an amendment to the articles of 20    incorporation or a report of cumulative changes in paid-in 21    capital, whenever any amendment or such report discloses 22    an increase in its paid-in capital over the amount thereof 23    last reported in any document, other than an annual   HB2861- 2 -LRB104 10889 SPS 20971 b1    report, interim annual report or final transition annual 2    report required by this Act to be filed in the office of 3    the Secretary of State.4        (c) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing 5    a report of paid-in capital following a statutory merger 6    or consolidation, which discloses that the paid-in capital 7    of the surviving or new corporation immediately after the 8    merger or consolidation is greater than the sum of the 9    paid-in capital of all of the merged or consolidated 10    corporations as last reported by them in any documents, 11    other than annual reports, required by this Act to be 12    filed in the office of the Secretary of State; and in 13    addition, the surviving or new corporation shall be liable 14    for a further additional franchise tax on the paid-in 15    capital of each of the merged or consolidated corporations 16    as last reported by them in any document, other than an 17    annual report, required by this Act to be filed with the 18    Secretary of State from their taxable year end to the next 19    succeeding anniversary month or, in the case of a 20    corporation which has established an extended filing 21    month, the extended filing month of the surviving or new 22    corporation; however if the taxable year ends within the 23    2-month period immediately preceding the anniversary month 24    or, in the case of a corporation which has established an 25    extended filing month, the extended filing month of the 26    surviving or new corporation the tax will be computed to   HB2861- 3 -LRB104 10889 SPS 20971 b1    the anniversary month or, in the case of a corporation 2    which has established an extended filing month, the 3    extended filing month of the surviving or new corporation 4    in the next succeeding calendar year.5        (d) An annual franchise tax payable each year with the 6    annual report which the corporation is required by this 7    Act to file.8    On or after January 1, 2020 and prior to January 1, 2021, 9the first $30 in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under 10this Section. On or after January 1, 2021, and prior to January 111, 2024, the first $1,000 in liability is exempt from the tax 12imposed under this Section. On or after January 1, 2024, and 13before January 1, 2025, the first $5,000 in liability is 14exempt from the tax imposed under this Section. On and after 15January 1, 2025 and before January 1, 2026, the first $10,000 16in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under this 17Section. On or after January 1, 2026 and before January 1, 182027, the first $100,000 in liability is exempt from the tax 19imposed under this Section. The provisions of this Section 20shall not require the payment of any franchise tax that would 21otherwise have been due and payable on or after January 1, 222027. There shall be no refunds or proration of franchise tax 23for any taxes due and payable on or after January 1, 2027 on 24the basis that a portion of the corporation's taxable year 25extends beyond January 1, 2027.26    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2028.  HB2861- 4 -LRB104 10889 SPS 20971 b1(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 2103-592, eff. 6-7-24.) 3    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-282, 102-558, 103-8, and 4103-592)5    Sec. 15.35. Franchise taxes payable by domestic 6corporations. For the privilege of exercising its franchises 7in this State, each domestic corporation shall pay to the 8Secretary of State the following franchise taxes, computed on 9the basis, at the rates and for the periods prescribed in this 10Act:11        (a) An initial franchise tax at the time of filing its 12    first report of issuance of shares.13        (b) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing 14    (1) a report of the issuance of additional shares, or (2) a 15    report of an increase in paid-in capital without the 16    issuance of shares, or (3) an amendment to the articles of 17    incorporation or a report of cumulative changes in paid-in 18    capital, whenever any amendment or such report discloses 19    an increase in its paid-in capital over the amount thereof 20    last reported in any document, other than an annual 21    report, interim annual report or final transition annual 22    report required by this Act to be filed in the office of 23    the Secretary of State.24        (c) An additional franchise tax at the time of filing 25    a report of paid-in capital following a statutory merger   HB2861- 5 -LRB104 10889 SPS 20971 b1    or consolidation, which discloses that the paid-in capital 2    of the surviving or new corporation immediately after the 3    merger or consolidation is greater than the sum of the 4    paid-in capital of all of the merged or consolidated 5    corporations as last reported by them in any documents, 6    other than annual reports, required by this Act to be 7    filed in the office of the Secretary of State; and in 8    addition, the surviving or new corporation shall be liable 9    for a further additional franchise tax on the paid-in 10    capital of each of the merged or consolidated corporations 11    as last reported by them in any document, other than an 12    annual report, required by this Act to be filed with the 13    Secretary of State from their taxable year end to the next 14    succeeding anniversary month or, in the case of a 15    corporation which has established an extended filing 16    month, the extended filing month of the surviving or new 17    corporation; however if the taxable year ends within the 18    2-month period immediately preceding the anniversary month 19    or, in the case of a corporation which has established an 20    extended filing month, the extended filing month of the 21    surviving or new corporation the tax will be computed to 22    the anniversary month or, in the case of a corporation 23    which has established an extended filing month, the 24    extended filing month of the surviving or new corporation 25    in the next succeeding calendar year.26        (d) An annual franchise tax payable each year with the   HB2861- 6 -LRB104 10889 SPS 20971 b1    annual report which the corporation is required by this 2    Act to file.3    On or after January 1, 2020 and prior to January 1, 2021, 4the first $30 in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under 5this Section. On or after January 1, 2021 and prior to January 61, 2024, the first $1,000 in liability is exempt from the tax 7imposed under this Section. On or after January 1, 2024, and 8before January 1, 2025, the first $5,000 in liability is 9exempt from the tax imposed under this Section. On and after 10January 1, 2025 and before January 1, 2026, the first $10,000 11in liability is exempt from the tax imposed under this 12Section. On or after January 1, 2026 and before January 1, 132027, the first $100,000 in liability is exempt from the tax 14imposed under this Section. The provisions of this Section 15shall not require the payment of any franchise tax that would 16otherwise have been due and payable on or after January 1, 172027. There shall be no refunds or proration of franchise tax 18for any taxes due and payable on or after January 1, 2027 on 19the basis that a portion of the corporation's taxable year 20extends beyond January 1, 2027.21    This Section is repealed on January 1, 2028.22(Source: P.A. 102-282, eff. 1-1-22; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 23103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.